New Jersey, session 222, S818.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     The various state professional boards are responsible for both the processing of initial license requests and the periodic licensure renewals as required by statute. b.    There is currently a significant backlog of these license requests in several of the regulated professions within the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety. c.     The efficient approval of professional licenses is of great importance to the people of New Jersey, both in terms of economic development and consumer protection. d.    This act is intended to provide the Division of Consumer Affairs with the resources necessary to reduce the license processing backlog by hiring additional staff for that purpose. 2.    The Division of Consumer Affairs, using criteria which will prioritize the reduction in license processing backlogs, shall hire additional staff for the purposes of alleviating the application and renewal backlog. 3.   There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety $10,000,000 annually for fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028 to implement the provisions of this act. 4.    The Division of Consumer Affairs shall provide an annual report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) that provides details on the spending authorized by this act.  It shall include, at a minimum: a.     the number of incremental additional resources hired by profession in accordance with this act; b.    the number of person-months by profession associated with that hiring; c.     the initial backlog of both new applications and renewals at the beginning of the fiscal year; and d.    the backlog of both new applications and renewals at the end of the fiscal year. 5.   This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire following the issuance of the report for fiscal year 2028 pursuant to section 4 of this act.